Maine, session 132, LD198.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. P&SL 1865, c. 532, §8-A, as amended by PL 2003, c.233, §5, is further
amended to read:
Section 8-A. Campus police; motor vehicle regulations; parking
enforcement. The trustees of the University of Maine System, or such administrators an
administrator of the University of Maine System as the trustees may designate designated
by the trustees for this purpose, may appoint persons to act as police officers who, within
the limits of the property owned by or under the control of the University of Maine System,
possess all of the powers of police officers in criminal cases and civil violations. The
trustees of the University of Maine System may authorize the University of Maine System's
full-time police officers who have met the requirements of the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 25, section 2804-C to perform any of the acts described in Title 17-A, section 15 while
outside the limits of the property owned by or under control of the University of Maine
System if the law enforcement agency of a foreign municipality in which the arrest is to be
made has requested assistance in advance by cooperative agreement. When a University
of Maine System police officer makes an arrest outside the limits of the property owned by
or under control of the University of Maine System as authorized in this section, that police
officer has the same immunity from tort liability and all of the pension, relief, disability,
workers' compensation, insurance and any other benefits the police officer enjoys while
performing duties within the limits of the property owned by or under control of the
University of Maine System. A University of Maine System police officer may not issue
a citation or summons to a person who is not a student of the University of Maine System
or an employee of the University of Maine System for a violation of any rules or regulations
relating to the parking of a motor vehicle within the limits of the property owned by or
under the control of the University of Maine System.
The trustees may make rules and regulations for the control, movement and parking of
motor vehicles within the limits of the property owned by or under the control of the
University of Maine System. The rules and regulations have the same force and effect as
municipal ordinances, and District Courts are authorized to impose fines not to exceed $50
for each parking violation. The trustees, by resolution, may adopt the provisions of the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 30-A, section 3009, subsection 1, relating to prima facie
evidence, the establishment of a waiver of court action by payment of specified fees and
the establishment and policing of parking spaces for handicapped persons with disabilities.
Notwithstanding this paragraph, speed limits within the limits of the property owned by or
under the control of the University of Maine System must be established by the Department
of Transportation and the Department of Public Safety, Maine State Police as provided in
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 29 29-A, section 1251 2073 and the speed limits must be
posted by the University of Maine System in accordance with written directions or policies
of the Department of Transportation. The A violation of any rules and regulations relating
to the movement of vehicles a motor vehicle is deemed to be a traffic infraction unless
defined classified as a felony or misdemeanor crime under Title 29 29-A.